Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1209
Job training grant; repayments.

The Department of Economic Development shall remit repayments of job training grants due to noncompliance to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 1995, LB 326, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 188.
December 31, 2026